Washington statutes.
RCW 42.52.370

Authority of commission on judicial conduct.

The commission on judicial conduct shall enforce this chapter and rules adopted under it with respect to state officers and employees of the judicial branch and may do so according to procedures prescribed in Article IV, section 31 of the state Constitution. In addition to the sanctions authorized in Article IV, section 31 of the state Constitution, the commission may impose sanctions authorized by this chapter.

[ 1994 c 154 s 207.]